Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1424
Tenant to use and occupy.

Unless otherwise agreed, the tenant shall occupy his dwelling unit only as a dwelling unit. The rental agreement may require that the tenant notify the landlord of any anticipated extended absence from the premises in excess of seven days no later than the first day of the extended absence.

Laws 1974, LB 293, § 24.